Utah statutes.
23-18-4.   Beaver damage -- Authorization to kill or trap.
Whenever it is apparent that beaver are doing damage to, or are a menace to,
private property, any landowner or tenant may request authorization to kill or
trap the beaver so involved; and the Wildlife Board is empowered to grant such
authorization under conditions prescribed by it.
